Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,286
Successor corporation; liability;
limitation.

(1)
Except as further limited in subsection (2) of this section, the cumulative
successor asbestos-related liabilities of a successor corporation are limited
to the fair market value of the total gross assets of the transferor determined
as of the time of the merger or consolidation. The successor corporation does
not have responsibility for successor asbestos-related liabilities in excess
of this limitation.

(2) If the transferor
had assumed or incurred successor asbestos-related liabilities in connection
with a prior merger or consolidation with a prior transferor, then the fair
market value of the total gross assets of the prior transferor determined
as of the time of the earlier merger or consolidation shall be substituted
for the limitation in subsection (1) of this section for purposes of determining
the limitation of liability of a successor corporation.

Laws 2010, LB763, § 4.